Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5618.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW to read as follows:(1) The state universities, regional universities, the state college, and each of their separate campuses must conspicuously post to the college or university website the following admissions information and data for both college or university-level admissions as well as major or program-specific admissions:(a) Scoring criteria, which may include:(i) Rubrics for admissions scoring;(ii) Weights assigned to grade point average, standardized tests, and course taking; and(iii) Weights assigned to admissions components, including academics, extracurriculars, personal essays, and other relevant application requirements;(b) Demographic characteristics of individuals who applied and separately who were accepted, including race, ethnicity, age, gender, parental income, parental education level, and residency; and(c) Grade point average of individuals who applied and separately who were accepted.(2) The state universities, regional universities, and state college must conspicuously post to the college's or university's website the criteria and rubrics used to score a candidate for admission to the college or university as well as any criteria used in major-specific admissions.--- END ---